Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1267.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "qualified taxpayer" and "semiconductor manufacturing" in section 1771-L of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1771-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Early stage semiconductor business." A business with less than $10,000,000 in revenue and in the areas of research or design of semiconductor materials, semiconductor devices or semiconductor packing and testing.* * *"Qualified taxpayer." A company that satisfies all of the following or is an early stage semiconductor business:(1) Conducts semiconductor manufacturing, biomedical manufacturing or biomedical research in this Commonwealth at a project facility in this Commonwealth that has been placed in service on or after the effective date of this section.(2) Has made a capital investment of at least [$200,000,000] $100,000,000 in order to construct the project facility and place the project facility into service in this Commonwealth.(3) Has created a minimum aggregate total of [800] 100 permanent jobs.(4) Has made good faith efforts to recruit and employ, and to encourage any contractors or subcontractors to recruit and employ, workers from the local labor market for employment during the construction of the project facility.(5) Has demonstrated that the new jobs created at the project facility or for work covered by Subarticle F are paid at least the prevailing minimum wage and benefit rates for each craft or classification as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry.(6) The construction work to place a project facility 20250HB1267PN1410 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 into service shall be performed subject to the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products Procurement Act."Semiconductor manufacturing." [The manufacture of components or the creation of advanced processes or technology within the semiconductor manufacturing and related equipment and material supplier sector.] Any of the following within the semiconductor manufacturing and related equipment and material supplier sector:(1) The manufacture of components, including semiconductor manufacturing, semiconductor wafer production, semiconductor fabrication, semiconductor packaging, manufacturing of semiconductors, manufacturing of semiconductor manufacturing equipment or semiconductor manufacturing equipment as defined in 26 CFR 1.48D-2 (relating to definitions) as of the effective date of this paragraph.(2) The creation of advanced processes or technology.(3) The advanced testing and packaging of components.Section 2. Section 1773-L(a) and (d)(2) of the act are amended and subsection (d) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1773-L. Application and approval of tax credit.(a) Determination of tax credit amount.--[The] Except as provided under paragraph (3), the annual tax credit amount may be determined based upon any one or more of the following:(1) No more than 2.5% of the capital investment.(2) No more than 100% of tax withheld from employees and paid under Article III or $20,000, whichever is less, for each permanent job at the project facility.20250HB1267PN1410 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 project facility in the prior calendar year.(3) If the applicant is an early stage semiconductor business, the applicant must have at least $3,000,000 in research and development investment during the previous year.* * *(d) Availability of tax credits.--* * *(2) The department shall issue [up to $10,000,000] a minimum of $1,000,000 in a fiscal year to [the qualified taxpayer] qualified taxpayers engaged in semiconductor manufacturing which first meets the qualifications to receive a tax credit under this subarticle. The department shall not exceed $8,000,000 in aggregate tax credits issued in one year.* * *(3.1) The department shall issue a minimum of $100,000 in a fiscal year to an early stage semiconductor business. An individual early stage semiconductor business may not receive more than $1,000,000 in any fiscal year. An award may be for up to five years. The department shall not exceed $2,000,000 in aggregate tax credits in one year.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1267PN1410 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122